Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1226
Governing board; budget; prepare; contents.

The board of each educational service unit, prior to the levying of any tax as provided by law, shall prepare a budget for the operation and maintenance of the educational service unit for the ensuing year. This budget shall itemize the contemplated expenditures and the expected revenue from taxation received by the educational service unit, from available federal, state, and county sources, from contractual revenue from school districts, and from all other agencies and sources.

Laws 1969, c. 700, § 1, p. 2699;

Laws 1972, LB 928, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2210.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 943.

Budget requirements, see section 13-517.